Washington statutes.
RCW 26.40.020

Removal, denial of parental responsibility—Commitment not an admission requirement to any school.

So long as the parents of a child with a disability are able to assume parental responsibility for such child, their parental responsibility may not be removed or denied, and commitment by the state or any officer or official thereof shall never be a requirement for the admission of such child to any state school, or institution, or to the common schools.

[ 2020 c 274 s 6; 1955 c 272 s 2.]